Florida, session 2026, HB283.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (7) is added to section 336.045,
Florida Statutes, to read:
336.045 Uniform minimum standards for design,
construction, and maintenance; advisory committees.—
(7) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, beginning
October 1, 2026, all design and construction plans for the
installation of a crosswalk in a school zone, or on any public
street, road, or highway with a posted speed limit exceeding 35
miles per hour, when located at any point other than at a
signalized intersection, shall include appropriate traffic
control devices that conform to either:
(a) Chapter 4J titled "Pedestrian Hybrid Beacons" of the
most recent Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and any
other applicable standards of the department; or
(b) Chapter 4L titled "Rectangular Rapid Flashing
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb283-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 283 2026
Beacons," Chapter 4S titled "Flashing Beacons," or Chapter 4U
titled "In-Roadway Warning Lights" of the most recent Manual on
Uniform Traffic Control Devices and any other applicable
standards of the department. In-Roadway Warning Lights shall be
used in conjunction with Rectangular Rapid Flashing Beacons or
Flashing Beacons to improve visibility of the crosswalk.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb283-00